Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.200

Receiver—Removal for cause.

The receiver shall proceed to wind up the affairs of the corporation with diligence and for negligence or misconduct in the discharge of his or her duties may be removed by the superior court upon a proper showing made by a taxpayer of the former city or town or by an unsatisfied creditor thereof.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2008; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.200. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 13, part; RRS s 8926, part.]